Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-833
Procurement of goods or services; director; powers; limitation.

The director may contract for, purchase, or lease goods or services necessary for effectuating the purpose of the State Lottery Act. All procurements shall be subject to the act and shall be exempt from any other state law concerning the purchase of any goods or services, and all purchases in excess of twenty-five thousand dollars shall be subject to approval by the Tax Commissioner.

Laws 1991, LB 849, § 33;

Laws 1993, LB 138, § 52;

Laws 2007, LB638, § 17.